it: Tipo di aquilone: Bow kite; C-kite; Delta kite; Delta-C kite; Foil kite; Kite ibrido; Open-C kite; Kite da gara; Kite da allenamento; Altro
tr: Uçurtma türü: Yay uçurtma; C uçurtma; Delta uçurtma; Delta-C uçurtma; Folyo uçurtma; Hibrit uçurtma; Açık-C uçurtma; Yarış uçurtması; Eğitim uçurtması; Diğer
lt-LT: Aitvaro tipas: Bow tipo aitvaras; C tipo aitvaras; Delta tipo aitvaras; Delta-C tipo aitvaras; Foil tipo aitvaras; Hibridinis aitvaras; Open-C tipo aitvaras; Lenktyninis aitvaras; Mokomasis aitvaras; Kita
fi: Leijan tyyppi: Bow-leija; C-leija; Delta-leija; Delta-C-leija; Patjaleija; Hybridileija; Open-C-leija; Kilpaleija; Harjoitusleija; Muu
hu: Sárkány típusa: Bow kite (íves ernyő); C-kite (C alakú ernyő); Delta kite; Delta-C kite; Paplanernyő; Hibrid kite; Open-C kite; Verseny kite; Gyakorló kite; Egyéb
cs: Typ draka: Bow kite; C-kite; Delta kite; Delta-C kite; Komorový drak; Hybridní drak; Open-C kite; Závodní drak; Cvičný drak; Jiné
sv: Draketyp: Bow-kite; C-kite; Delta-kite; Delta-C-kite; Foil-kite; Hybrid-kite; Open-C-kite; Racing-kite; Trainer-kite; Övrigt
es: Tipo de kite: Cometa bow; Cometa C; Cometa delta; Cometa Delta-C; Cometa foil; Cometa híbrida; Cometa Open-C; Cometa de carreras; Cometa de entrenamiento; Otra
ru: Тип кайта: Боу-кайт; С-кайт; Дельта-кайт; Дельта-С-кайт; Парафойл; Гибридный кайт; Open-C-кайт; Гоночный кайт; Пилотажный кайт; Другое
hr-HR: Vrsta zmaja: Bow zmaj; C-zmaj; Delta zmaj; Delta-C zmaj; Foil zmaj; Hibridni zmaj; Open-C zmaj; Natjecateljski zmaj; Zmaj za vježbanje; Ostalo
de: Typ des Kites: Bow-Kite; C-Kite; Delta-Kite; Delta-C-Kite; Foil-Kite; Hybrid-Kite; Open-C-Kite; Racing-Kite; Trainer-Kite; Sonstige
da: Kitetype: Bow-kite; C-kite; Delta-kite; Delta-C-kite; Foil-kite; Hybrid-kite; Open-C-kite; Racing-kite; Trænings-kite; Andet
vi: Loại diều: Diều hình cung; Diều chữ C; Diều Delta; Diều Delta-C; Diều foil; Diều lai; Diều chữ C mở; Diều đua; Diều tập; Khác
zh-TW: 風箏類型: 弓型風箏; C 型風箏; 三角型風箏; Delta-C 型風箏; 軟體風箏; 混合型風箏; 開放式 C 型風箏; 競速風箏; 訓練風箏; 其他
ja: 凧タイプ: ボウカイト; C カイト; デルタカイト; Delta-C カイト; フォイルカイト; ハイブリッドカイト; オープンCカイト; レーシングカイト; トレーナーカイト; その他
fr: Type de cerf-volant: Aile plate (bow); Aile en C; Aile Delta; Aile Delta-C; Aile à caissons; Aile hybride; Aile Open-C; Aile de course; Aile de traction (Trainer); Autre
ro-RO: Tip de zmeu: Zmeu tip arc; Zmeu tip C; Zmeu tip Delta; Zmeu tip Delta-C; Zmeu tip folie; Zmeu hibrid; Zmeu tip Open-C; Zmeu pentru curse; Zmeu de antrenament; Altele
pt-PT: Tipo de kite: Bow kite; C-kite; Delta kite; Delta-C kite; Foil kite; Kite híbrido; Open-C kite; Kite de corrida; Kite de treino; Outro
sl-SI: Vrsta zmaja: Lokasti zmaj; Zmaj oblike C; Zmaj oblike delta; Zmaj oblike delta C; Zmaj s folijo; Hibridni zmaj; Zmaj oblike odprtega C; Tekmovalni zmaj; Šolski zmaj; Drugo
bg-BG: Тип кайт: Боу кайт; C-кайт; Делта кайт; Delta-C кайт; Фойл кайт; Хибриден кайт; Open-C кайт; Състезателен кайт; Тренировъчен кайт; Друго
sk-SK: Typ draka: Bow kite; C-kite; Delta kite; Delta-C kite; Foil kite; Hybridný kite; Open-C kite; Pretekársky kite; Cvičný kite; Iné
nl: Kite type: Bowkite; C-kite; Deltakite; Delta-C kite; Foilkite; Hybride kite; Open-C kite; Racekite; Trainerkite; Anders
zh-CN: 风筝类型: 弓形风筝; C 形风筝; 三角形风筝; Delta-C 型风筝; 软体风筝; 混合风筝; 开放式 C 形风筝; 竞速风筝; 训练风筝; 其他
pl: Typ latawca: Latawiec typu Bow; Latawiec typu C-Shape; Latawiec typu Delta; Latawiec typu Delta-C; Latawiec komorowy; Latawiec hybrydowy; Latawiec typu Open-C; Latawiec wyścigowy; Latawiec treningowy; Inny
pt-BR: Tipo de kite: Kite bow; Kite C; Kite Delta; Kite Delta-C; Foil kite; Kite híbrido; Kite Open-C; Kite de corrida; Kite de treinamento; Outro
nb: Dragens type: Bow-kite; C-kite; Delta-kite; Delta-C-kite; Foil-kite; Hybrid-kite; Open-C-kite; Racing-kite; Trenings-kite; Annet
th: ประเภทว่าว: ว่าวทรงโค้ง; ว่าวทรงตัว C; ว่าวทรงเดลต้า; ว่าวทรงเดลต้า C; ว่าวฟอยล์; ว่าวไฮบริด; ว่าวทรง Open-C; ว่าวแข่งขัน; ว่าวสำหรับฝึกซ้อม; อื่นๆ
ko: 연 유형: 보우 카이트; C형 카이트; 델타 카이트; 델타-C 카이트; 포일 카이트; 하이브리드 카이트; 오픈 C 카이트; 레이싱 카이트; 트레이너 카이트; 기타
el: Τύπος αετού (Kite): Kite τύπου bow; C-kite; Delta kite; Delta-C kite; Foil kite; Υβριδικό kite; Open-C kite; Αγωνιστικό kite; Εκπαιδευτικό kite; Άλλο
en: Kite type: Bow kite; C-kite; Delta kite; Delta-C kite; Foil kite; Hybrid kite; Open-C kite; Racing kite; Trainer kite; Other